Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 21

Outdoor Advertising Control Act of 2020

54-21-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Outdoor Advertising Control Act of 2020.”

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adjacent area” means that area within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of interstate and primary highways and visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highways;

“Changeable message sign” means an outdoor advertising device that displays a series of messages at intervals by means of digital display or mechanical rotating panels;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee;

“Compensation” means the exchange of anything of value, including money, securities, real property interests, personal property interests, goods or services, promise of future payment, or forbearance of debt;

“Conforming” means an outdoor advertising device that was permitted under and conforms to the zoning, size, lighting, and spacing criteria established in accordance with either the current agreement entered into between the commissioner and the secretary of transportation of the United States on or about October 18, 1984, or the original agreement entered into on or about November 11, 1971, as authorized in § 54-21-113. Any permitted outdoor advertising device that continues to conform to either the current agreement or the original agreement and conditions provided in § 54-21-113 is considered conforming;

“Customary maintenance” means maintenance of a nonconforming outdoor advertising device, which may include, but shall not exceed, the replacement of the sign face and stringers in like materials, and the replacement in like materials of up to fifty percent (50%) of the device's poles, posts, or other support structures; provided, that the replacement of any poles, posts, or other support structures is limited to one (1) time within a twenty-four-month period;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Destroyed” means, with respect to a nonconforming outdoor advertising device, that, in the case of wooden sign structures, sixty percent (60%) or more of the upright supports of a sign structure are physically damaged such that normal repair practices would call for replacement of the broken supports or, in the case of metal sign structures, replacement of at least thirty percent (30%) of the length above ground of each broken, bent, or twisted support;

“Digital display” means a type of changeable message sign that displays a series of messages at intervals through the electronic coding of lights or light emitting diodes or any other means that does not use or require mechanical rotating panels;

“Directional sign” means an official sign that identifies a site, attraction, or activity and directional information useful to a traveler in locating the site, attraction, or activity, including mileage, route numbers, or exit numbers;

“Erect” means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place, affix, attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into being or establish, but does not apply to changes of copy treatment on an existing outdoor advertising device;

“Facility” means a commercial or industrial facility, or other facility open to the public, that operates with regular business hours on a year-round basis within a building or defined physical space, which may include a structure other than a building, together with any immediately adjacent parking areas; provided, that activity conducted in a temporary structure or a structure operated only on a seasonal basis may be considered a facility for the purpose of allowing an on-premises device to be located on the same property, but the device is only allowed on a temporary basis during the period the facility is actually conducting activity;

“Information center” means an area or site established and maintained at a safety rest area for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within this state and providing other information the commissioner may consider desirable;

“Interstate system” means that portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways, located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be designated, by the commissioner, and approved by the secretary of transportation of the United States, pursuant to title 23 of the United States Code;

“Main traveled way” means the traveled way of a highway on which through traffic is carried. In the case of a divided highway, the traveled way of each of the separated roadways for traffic in opposite directions is a main traveled way. “Main traveled way” does not include such facilities as frontage roads, turning roadways, or parking areas;

“Nonconforming” means an outdoor advertising device that does not conform to the zoning, size, lighting, or spacing criteria established by and in accordance with either the current agreement entered into between the commissioner and the secretary of transportation of the United States, or in accordance with the original agreement entered into on or about November 11, 1971, as authorized in § 54-21-113. Any outdoor advertising device that continues to conform to either the current agreement or the original agreement as provided in § 54-21-113 shall not be considered nonconforming;

“On-premises device” means a sign:

That is located within fifty feet (50') of, and on the same parcel of property and on the same side of the highway as, the facility that owns or operates the sign or within fifty feet (50') of, and on the same parcel of property and on the same side of the highway as, the entrance to the parcel of property upon which two (2) or more facilities are located; and

For which compensation is not being received and not intended to be received;

“Outdoor advertising device”:

Means a sign that is operated or owned by a person or entity that is earning compensation directly or indirectly from a third party or parties for the placement of a message on the sign; and

Does not include a sign that is an on-premises device or other type of sign exempt from regulation under this chapter;

“Person” means and includes an individual, a partnership, an association, a corporation, or other entity;

“Primary system” means that portion of connected main highways, located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be designated by the commissioner, and approved by the secretary of transportation of the United States, pursuant to title 23 of the United States Code, including highways designated as part of the national highway system and highways formerly designated as part of the federal-aid primary system;

“Safety rest area” means an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the right-of-way by or under public supervision or control, for the convenience of the traveling public;

“Sign” means an outdoor sign, light, display, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing which is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform any part of the advertising or informative contents of which is visible from any place on the main traveled way of an interstate system or primary system;

“State system” means that portion of highways located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be designated by the commissioner;

“Traveled way” means the portion of a roadway for the movement of vehicles, exclusive of shoulders;

“Unzoned commercial or industrial area”:

Means an area on which there is located one (1) or more permanent structures within which a commercial or industrial business is actively conducted, and which is equipped with all customary utilities facilities and open to the public regularly or regularly used by employees of the business as their principal work station, or which, due to the nature of the business, is equipped, staffed, and accessible to the public as necessary, and includes the area along the highway extending outward six hundred feet (600') from and beyond the edge of such activity in each direction and a corresponding zone directly across a primary highway that is not also a limited access highway when the area is not primarily residential in character or a:

Public park;

Public playground;

Public recreational area;

Public forest, wildlife, or waterfowl refuge;

Historic scenic area; or

Cemetery;

Does not include land across the highway from a commercial or industrial activity when the highway is an interstate or controlled access primary highway;

Must be measured from the outer edges of the regularly used buildings, parking lots, storage, processing, or landscaped areas of the commercial or industrial activity, not from the property lines of the activity, and the measurements must be along or parallel to the edge of the pavement of the highway; and

Does not include the following activities conducted within the area, when considered for purposes of outdoor advertising:

Outdoor advertising structures;

Agricultural, forestry, ranching, grazing, farming, and related activities, including wayside fresh produce stands;

Transient or temporary activities;

Activities not visible from the main traveled way;

Activities more than six hundred sixty feet (660') from the nearest edge of the right-of-way;

Activities conducted in a building primarily used as a residence; and

Railroad tracks and minor sidings;

“Utility signs” means warning signs, notices, or markers that are customarily erected and maintained for operational and public safety purposes by publicly or privately owned utilities, railroads, ferries, airports, or other entities that provide utility or transportation services; and

“Visible” means capable of being seen, whether or not readable, without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-103. Restrictions on outdoor advertising devices on interstate and primary highways.

An outdoor advertising device shall not be erected or maintained within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highway systems in this state except the following:

Outdoor advertising devices located in areas that are zoned industrial or commercial under authority of local government law and whose size, lighting, and spacing are consistent with customary use as determined by agreement between the state and the secretary of transportation of the United States; and

Outdoor advertising devices located in unzoned commercial or industrial areas as may be determined by agreement between the state and the secretary of transportation of the United States.

The following types of signs are not subject to regulation as outdoor advertising devices under subsection (a):

Official signs and notices, including directional signs, authorized or required by law;

On-premises devices;

Signs other than outdoor advertising devices that:

Have a sign face that does not exceed twenty square feet (20 sq. ft.) in total area; and

Do not contain any flashing, intermittent, or moving lights;

Landmark signs lawfully in existence on October 22, 1965, as authorized under 23 U.S.C. § 131 and 23 CFR 750.710; and

Utility signs.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-104. Permits and tags — Fees.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, a person shall not construct, erect, operate, use, maintain, or cause or permit to be constructed, erected, operated, used, or maintained, any outdoor advertising device within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highway systems without first obtaining from the commissioner a permit and tag.

If an existing outdoor advertising device was not subject to this chapter when it was erected but is subsequently made subject to this chapter by a federal law or action that adds a highway or section of a highway to the interstate or primary highway systems, such outdoor advertising device is required to obtain a permit and tag from the commissioner as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

An outdoor advertising device erected within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highway systems between September 11, 2019, and June 22, 2020, is deemed legal conforming or legal nonconforming and is required to obtain a permit and tag from the department as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

Outdoor advertising devices that were permitted under the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, compiled in this chapter as it existed prior to June 22, 2020, shall be assigned the same permit number that was given under that act.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2), permits and tags shall not be issued until applications are made in accordance with and on forms provided by the commissioner and accompanied by payment of a fee of two hundred dollars ($200) for each permit and tag requested. This fee represents payment for the required tag and for the first annual permit and is not subject to return upon rejection of any application. The commissioner shall use best efforts to process an application for a permit, in accordance with the rules of the department, within no greater than sixty (60) days after a completed application is received. If the application is incomplete or defective on its face, the commissioner shall notify an applicant in writing no later than fifteen (15) days of receipt of the filed application of its incomplete or defective status, and indicate the information or documentation that is needed to complete or correct the application. If a decision either to issue or deny the permit cannot be made within sixty (60) days after receipt of the completed or corrected application, the commissioner shall contact the applicant prior to the expiration of the sixty (60) days to provide an explanation of the reasons why additional time is needed to process the application.

If an existing outdoor advertising device is made subject to this chapter under subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) or if an existing outdoor advertising device that was subject to this chapter when it was erected but is subsequently modified from its original permitted state as provided in subdivision (a)(2), the owner or operator of the outdoor advertising device shall obtain a permit and tag in the same manner as provided in subdivision (b)(1) except as follows:

The application for the permit and tag must be made on an application form specifically provided for this purpose;

The application form must exempt the applicant from providing:

Any stake or mark on the ground showing the location of the outdoor advertising device on the real property;

A map or scaled drawing showing the property lines of the real property within which the outdoor advertising device is located, the location of the outdoor advertising device within the real property, the public roads adjacent to the real property, or the means of access to the outdoor advertising device; or

Any affidavit or other document from the real property owner verifying that the owner has granted the applicant the right to construct and operate the outdoor advertising device on the real property;

The application must be accompanied by payment of a fee of seventy dollars ($70.00) for each permit and tag requested. This fee represents payment for the required tag and for the first annual permit and is not subject to return upon rejection of any application;

After a completed application is submitted to and processed by the department in accordance with this subdivision (b)(2) and the applicable provisions of the department's outdoor advertising device regulations, the department shall issue the permit, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2)(F);

The department shall not deny a permit for an existing outdoor advertising device under this subdivision (b)(2) solely because the outdoor advertising device does not meet the size, lighting, spacing, or zoning criteria that are required for new outdoor advertising devices under current law and regulations;

An application for a permit may be denied on other grounds under this subdivision (b)(2) only in accordance with current law or regulations, including as follows:

The outdoor advertising device is located within or encroaches upon state highway right-of-way;

There is no access to the outdoor advertising device for maintenance or operational purposes except by direct access from state highway right-of-way or across the state's access control limits;

The applicant for the permit is subject to enforcement action under § 54-21-105(c); or

Issuance of the permit would violate federal law;

Before denying a permit on any of the grounds provided in subdivision (b)(2)(F)(i), the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the violation that prevents issuance of the permit. The department shall also give the applicant a reasonable amount of time to undertake such action, if any, that would cure the violation. If the applicant cures the violation, the department shall issue the permit, but if the applicant fails to cure the violation, the department shall deny the permit;

Any permit that is issued under this subdivision (b)(2) must indicate whether the outdoor advertising device is characterized and regulated as a conforming or nonconforming device under this chapter based upon the conditions and laws in effect on the date of the department's field inspection. The department shall notify the applicant in writing of the reason or reasons for characterizing a device as nonconforming; and

The applicant has the right to appeal the department's decision in accordance with the department's outdoor advertising device rules and the applicable provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

An application for an addendum to an existing permit requesting authorization to upgrade an existing outdoor advertising device to a changeable message sign with a digital display, as provided in § 54-21-119, must also be accompanied by payment of a fee of two hundred dollars ($200), which is not subject to return upon rejection of the application. An outdoor advertising device authorized by a valid permit from the department that was effective on September 10, 2019, and has been upgraded to a changeable message sign with a digital display between September 11, 2019, and June 22, 2020 is required to apply for an addendum to the permit in accordance with this subdivision (b)(3). The department shall charge an application fee of seventy dollars ($70.00) for the addendum to the permit and shall process the application in the same manner as provided for an original permit under subdivisions (b)(2)(E)-(H).

For the purposes of issuing permits and regulating outdoor advertising devices in accordance with this chapter, the location of a permitted outdoor advertising device is determined by the location of the supporting monopole, or by the location of the supporting pole nearest to the highway in the case of a device erected on multiple supporting poles; provided, however, that where a permitted multiple-pole device may be lawfully reconstructed, the replacement of the supporting poles with a monopole is not considered a change of location requiring a new permit if:

The permittee gives advance notice to, and receives the prior approval of, the department before reconstructing the outdoor advertising device;

The monopole is erected within the line segment defined by the previous supporting poles; and

The location of the monopole meets applicable spacing requirements.

Any advertising structure existing along the parkway system by and for the sole benefit of a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) is exempt from the payment of fees for permits or tags under this subsection (b).

All tags issued are permanent; however, permits must be renewed annually between November 1 and December 31, and the commissioner shall charge the sum of seventy dollars ($70.00) for 2021 and thereafter for annual renewal of each permit. A valid permit that was effective on September 10, 2019, shall not become invalid based on any failure to renew the permit between November 1 and December 31, 2019, and such permit shall not be subject to renewal until the renewal period occurring after June 22, 2020.

In the event that a permit has not been renewed by December 31 for the following year as required by subdivision (c)(1), the permit is not considered void until the commissioner has given the permit holder notice of the failure to renew and the opportunity to correct the unlawfulness, as provided in § 54-21-105(b). The department must send the notice of the failure to renew within sixty (60) days after the failure to renew. The failure to renew may be remedied by submitting a late renewal form and paying the annual permit renewal fee together with a late fee, in the total amount of two hundred dollars ($200), within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt of the notice. If a permit holder fails to renew the permit within this one-hundred-twenty-day notice period, then the permit is void and the outdoor advertising device is considered unlawful and subject to removal as further provided in § 54-21-105. The notice given by the commissioner must include the requirements for renewal and consequences of failure to renew as provided by this subdivision (c)(2).

For each permit issued, the commissioner shall deliver to the applicant a serially numbered permit tag, which must be attached on the outdoor advertising device in a manner as to be visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary highway. If more than one (1) side of any structure is used for an outdoor advertising device, a permit and tag is required for each side. Any outdoor advertising device sculptured in the round is considered to have three (3) sides.

For each replacement tag issued, the commissioner shall deliver to the applicant a serially numbered permit tag. The cost of this replacement tag is twenty-five dollars ($25.00), payable at the time of request.

Whenever it becomes necessary to transfer a permit from one (1) permit holder to another, the department shall charge a transfer fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the permit holder of record.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-105. Failure to comply with § 54-21-104 — Effect.

Any owner of any outdoor advertising device who has failed to act in accordance with § 54-21-104 must remove the outdoor advertising device immediately.

Failure to remove the outdoor advertising device renders the outdoor advertising device a public nuisance and subject to immediate disposal, removal, or destruction.

In addition, the commissioner has the authority to assess and collect from the owner a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for each calendar day after the date that the owner is determined through a contested case hearing to have failed to act in accordance with § 54-21-104. The total amount of the civil penalty imposed each year must not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

In addition, or in lieu of subdivisions (a)(1)-(3), the commissioner may enter upon any property on which an outdoor advertising device is located and dispose of, remove, or destroy the outdoor advertising device, all without incurring any liability for those actions.

Prior to invoking this section, the commissioner shall give notice either by certified mail or by personal service to the owner of the outdoor advertising device or occupant of the land on which the outdoor advertising device is located. The notice must specify the basis for the alleged unlawfulness, the remedial action that is required to correct the unlawfulness, and advise that a failure to take the remedial action or request a hearing within forty-five (45) days results in the sign being subject to removal. In addition, the commissioner must give, or have previously given, the owner or operator of the outdoor advertising device an opportunity to request a contested case hearing in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to determine the lawfulness of the outdoor advertising device. For good cause shown, the commissioner may extend the forty-five-day period for remedial action for up to an additional one hundred fifty (150) days, so long as all advertising content is removed from the unlawful outdoor advertising device within the forty-five-day period. If advertising content is placed on the outdoor advertising device during any extended period, the outdoor advertising device may be immediately removed by the commissioner without further notice. The owner of the outdoor advertising device is liable to the state for damages equal to three (3) times the cost of removal, in addition to disgorgement of any profit and gains or benefit derived from the violation and any other applicable fees, costs, or damages. The owner of the land on which the outdoor advertising device is located shall not be presumed to be the owner of the outdoor advertising device simply because it is on the owner's property.

If the department has reason to believe that a sign is being operated, in whole or part, as an outdoor advertising device without first obtaining a permit as required under § 54-21-104, the department may issue an investigative request to the owner or operator of the sign, the owner of the property, or any other person for the purpose of obtaining relevant documents or information to determine whether the sign is being operated as an outdoor advertising device.

If, after being served with an investigative request by the department under subdivision (c)(1), the person provides the requested documents or information and the department determines that the sign is being operated as an outdoor advertising device in violation of §§ 54-21-103 and 54-21-104, the department shall issue a written order to the owner or operator of the outdoor advertising device explaining the basis for determining that the sign is an outdoor advertising device and directing the owner or operator of the device to remedy the violation by applying for the applicable outdoor advertising device permit, or by removing the unlawful device, as appropriate, by the date set forth in the order, which shall be no less than sixty (60) days after the date of the order.

The person may appeal the department's order under subdivision (c)(2) by filing a written notice of appeal with the department within thirty (30) days of the date on which the order is issued. If an appeal is timely filed with the department, the department shall initiate a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to hear the person's appeal.

If a person fails to comply with the department's investigative request under subdivision (c)(1), or if the department reasonably believes the documents or information provided are incomplete or inaccurate, the department may initiate a contested case proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act to compel the production of relevant documents or information and to determine whether the outdoor advertising device is being operated in violation of §§ 54-21-103 and 54-21-104 and therefore subject to enforcement action under § 54-21-105.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-106. Disposition of fees.

All fees received by the commissioner under § 54-21-104 must be paid into the state treasury and placed in the highway fund for the administration of this chapter, and any fees received in excess of those administration costs shall be allocated to the department's general fund.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.